Tennessee, session 114, HB0386.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-1-102(1)(A)(v), is amended by
deleting "fourteen (14)" and substituting "forty-five (45)".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 36-1-142(a), is amended by deleting
"fourteen (14)" and substituting "forty-five (45)".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-255(a)(4), is amended by
deleting "fourteen (14)" and substituting "forty-five (45)".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-255(a)(6), is amended by
deleting "fourteen (14)" and substituting "forty-five (45)".
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-255(b)(1)(A), is amended by
deleting "fourteen-day period" and substituting "forty-five-day period".
SECTION 6. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0386
000152
- 1 -